District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.02

Prescriptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting or interfering with District of Columbia, state or federal regulation and monitoring of the handling and dispensing of prescription drugs.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 802, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2072.
1973 Ed., § 6-1644.